Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.100

Entities—Fines.

(1) When imposed on an entity for any criminal offense for which no special business fine is specified, a sentence to pay a fine may not exceed:

(a) One million dollars for a class A felony;

(b) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for a class B felony;

(c) Five hundred thousand dollars for a class C felony;

(d) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars for a gross misdemeanor; and

(e) Fifty thousand dollars for a misdemeanor.

(2) If a special fine for entities is expressly specified in the statute that defines an offense, the fine fixed must be within the limits specified in the statute.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "entity" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.08.030.

[ 2019 c 211 s 5; 1925 ex.s. c 101 s 1; RRS s 2011-4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 211: See note following RCW 10.01.090.